Washington statutes.
RCW 39.34.230

Covered emergencies—Interlocal agreements for mutual aid and cooperation—Liability of state—Existing rights.

(1) During a covered emergency, the department of commerce may enter into interlocal agreements under this chapter with one or more public agencies for the purposes of providing mutual aid and cooperation to any public agency affected by the cause of the emergency.

(2) All legal liability by a public agency and its employees for damage to property or injury or death to persons caused by acts done or attempted during, or while traveling to or from, a covered emergency, or in preparation for a covered emergency, pursuant to an interlocal agreement entered into under this section, or under the color of this section in a bona fide attempt to comply therewith, shall be the obligation of the state of Washington. Suits may be instituted and maintained against the state for the enforcement of such liability, or for the indemnification of any public agency or its employees for damage done to their private property, or for any judgment against them for acts done in good faith in compliance with this chapter: PROVIDED, That the foregoing shall not be construed to result in indemnification in any case of willful misconduct, gross negligence, or bad faith on the part of any public agency or any of a public agency's employees: PROVIDED, That should the United States or any agency thereof, in accordance with any federal statute, rule, or regulation, provide for the payment of damages to property and/or for death or injury as provided for in this section, then and in that event there shall be no liability or obligation whatsoever upon the part of the state of Washington for any such damage, death, or injury for which the United States government assumes liability.

(3) For purposes of this section, "covered emergency" means an emergency for which the governor has proclaimed a state of emergency under RCW 43.06.010, and for which the governor has authorized the department of commerce to enter into interlocal agreements under this section.

(4) This section shall not affect the right of any person to receive benefits to which he or she would otherwise be entitled under the workers' compensation law, or under any pension or retirement law, nor the right of any such person to receive any benefits or compensation under any act of congress.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2026; 2008 c 181 s 101.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.

Part headings not law—2008 c 181: See note following RCW 43.06.220.